Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-174
Department; responsibilities; costs; how paid.

The department shall be responsible for the general administration of the activities of each of the boards. The cost of operation and administration of the boards shall be paid from the General Fund and the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.

Laws 1972, LB 1385, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 958, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 10, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 115;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-121.01;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 300;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 74.